apertium-epo-fra.fra.dix
<pardef n="esquimau__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="anglais__adj">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="anima/l__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ux</l>        <r>l<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="anima/l__n" c="autoconcord:m,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ux</l>        <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="liste/l__n" c="autoconcord:m,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ls</l>        <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aux</l>       <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="annon/cer__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cent</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cer</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cera</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerai</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ceraient</l>  <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerais</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerais</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerait</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ceras</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerez</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ceriez</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerions</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerons</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ceront</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cez</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cez</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cez</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciez</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciez</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cions</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cions</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cèrent</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cé</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cée</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cées</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cés</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ça</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çai</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çaient</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çais</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çais</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çait</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çant</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e>       <p><l>çant</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>ças</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çasse</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çassent</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çasses</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çassiez</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çassions</l>  <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çons</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çons</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çons</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çâmes</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çât</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>çâtes</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="annuel__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="annuel__adjadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lement</l>    <r>lement<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="audiovisuel">     <i>audiovisuel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="balancer">        <i>balan</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="béninois">        <i>béninois</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bocal">           <i>boca</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="burundais">       <i>burundais</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="chenal">          <i>chena</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="confessionnal">   <i>confessionna</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="confidentiel">    <i>confidentiel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="confraternel">    <i>confraternel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="contentieux">     <i>contentieux</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="courroucer" a="revo"><i>courrou</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cruel" a="webform"><i>cruel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="délictuel">       <i>délictuel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="écorcer" a="revo"><i>écor</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="égal">            <i>éga</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="énoncer" a="revo"><i>énon</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="antianglais"><p><l>anti-anglais</l><r>antianglais</r></p><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="Esquimau">        <i>Esquimau</i><par n="esquimau__n"/></e>
<e lm="éternel">         <i>éternel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exercer des représailles"><i>exer</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>représailles</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>représailles</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="féodal">          <i>féoda</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="finlandais">      <i>finlandais</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="formel" a="webform"><i>formel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gaulois">         <i>gaulois</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="générationnel">   <i>générationnel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="glacer">          <i>gla</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hyksos">          <i>hyksos</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="immatériel">      <i>immatériel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="inconditionnel" a="webform"><i>inconditionnel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="instrumental">    <i>instrumenta</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="interministériel"><i>interministériel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="lausannois">      <i>lausannois</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="listel">          <i>liste</i><par n="liste/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="mal">             <i>ma</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="manigancer" a="revo"><i>manigan</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="maréchal">        <i>marécha</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="matériel">        <i>matériel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="multiculturel">   <i>multiculturel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="néerlandais">     <i>néerlandais</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="opérationnel">    <i>opérationnel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="peu naturel">     <i>peu<b/>naturel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="procès verbal">   <i>procès<b/>verba</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="prononcer">       <i>pronon</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rassis">          <i>rassis</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e lm="relationnel">     <i>relationnel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="spirituel" a="webform"><i>spirituel</i><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tangentiel">      <i>tangentiel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="total">           <i>tota</i><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="trimestriel">     <i>trimestriel</i><par n="annuel__adjadv"/></e>
<e lm="val">             <i>va</i><par n="liste/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="villageois">      <i>villageois</i><par n="anglais__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="écorcer" a="revo"><p><l>Ecor</l><r>Écor</r></p><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="éditorial"><p><l>Editoria</l>  <r>Éditoria</r></p><par n="anima/l__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="éventuel"> <p><l>Eventuel</l>  <r>Éventuel</r></p><par n="annuel__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="prononcer ses voeux"><i>pronon</i><par n="annon/cer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>ses<b/>voeux</l><r><g><b/>ses<b/>voeux</g></r></p></e>
